Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7114.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-21 of the General Laws entitled "Health and Safety of Pupils" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
16-21-44. Bullying -- Directed community service.
(a) This section shall establish a form of restorative justice designed to address acts of
bullying (the "action") in and around schools that are based on religious beliefs, sexual orientation,
or ethnicity, in a manner which provides a suitable sanction for the action but also promotes
learning, knowledge, and insight to deter a student from engaging in future acts of bullying.
(b) As used in this section, the term "bullying" has the same meaning as "bullying" and
"cyberbullying" as defined in § 16-21-33.
(c) A student who commits an act or acts of bullying which is based upon or related to the
religious beliefs, sexual orientation, or ethnicity of the person subject to the bullying, may when
determined to be appropriate, in addition to any other penalties provided by law, be required to
perform up to ten (10) hours of directed community service in a setting and manner to both deter a
student from engaging in future acts of bullying, and also to promote learning, knowledge, and
insight. This community service may be imposed by a juvenile hearing board, or a school
administration, or any combination thereof. Directed community service imposed by a school
administration or juvenile hearing board shall not be deemed a criminal penalty.
(d) Directed community service shall be tailored to the bullying action. By way of
illustration only, and without imposing any limitations, for a student who has bullied a student

based upon the student’s Jewish faith or heritage, directed community service pursuant to this
section could be performed at a Holocaust museum.
(e) Any community service imposed pursuant to the provisions of this section shall need
to be completed within three (3) months from the date of imposition.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003216/SUB A
========
LC003216/SUB A - Page 2 of 3